Illinois, session 104th, SB1233.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The River Conservancy Districts Act is amended 5by changing Section 4a as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 2105/4a)  (from Ch. 42, par. 386a)7    Sec. 4a. Every conservancy district so established shall 8be governed by a board of trustees. In the statement finding 9the results of the election to be favorable to the 10establishment of the district, the circuit court shall 11determine and name each municipality within the district 12having 5,000 or more population according to the last 13preceding federal census.14        (1) In case there is one or more municipalities having 15    a population of 5,000 or more within the district, the 16    trustees shall be appointed as follows:17            (a) In districts organized prior to July 1, 1961, 18        where there is only one such municipality, 3 trustees 19        shall be appointed from such municipality, and one 20        trustee shall be appointed from the area within the 21        district outside of such municipality, and one trustee 22        shall be appointed at large. In districts organized on 23        and after July 1, 1961, where there is only one such   SB1233- 2 -LRB104 05147 RTM 15176 b1        municipality one trustee shall be appointed from such 2        municipality, and one trustee shall be appointed from 3        each county in the district, except that where the 4        district is wholly contained within a single county, 5        one trustee shall be appointed from that county and 6        one additional trustee shall be appointed from the 7        municipality, and, in any case, 2 trustees shall be 8        appointed at large. A trustee appointed from a county 9        in the district shall be appointed from the area 10        outside any such municipality. If the district is 11        located wholly within the corporate limits of such 12        municipality, 3 of the trustees of the district shall 13        be appointed from such municipality, and 2 trustees 14        shall be appointed at large. In a district wholly 15        contained within a single county of between 60,500 and 16        70,000 population and having no more than one 17        municipality of 5,000 or more population, regardless 18        of the date of organization, 3 trustees shall be 19        appointed from that municipality, 2 trustees shall be 20        appointed from the district outside that municipality, 21        and 2 trustees shall be appointed at large. No more 22        than 2 appointments by each appointing authority may 23        be from the same political party.24            In the case of the Saline Valley Conservancy 25        District, in addition to the other trustees as 26        provided in this subsection (a), the mayor of each   SB1233- 3 -LRB104 05147 RTM 15176 b1        municipality with a population of 2,000 to 4,999 that 2        purchases water from the District may appoint one 3        member to the Board of Trustees beginning July 1, 2023 4        for a 5-year term, and the member shall serve until the 5        trustee's successor is appointed and qualified or the 6        municipality no longer purchases water from the 7        District. A vacancy shall be filled by the mayor of the 8        municipality for the remainder of the term. 9            (b) Where there are 2 or more such municipalities, 10        one trustee shall be appointed from each such 11        municipality, one trustee shall be appointed from each 12        county in the district for each 50,000 population or 13        part thereof within the district in such county 14        according to the last preceding federal census, and 2 15        trustees shall be appointed at large. A trustee 16        appointed from a county in the district shall be 17        appointed from the area outside any such municipality. 18        If the district is located wholly within the corporate 19        limits of such municipalities, 2 trustees shall be 20        appointed from the one of such municipalities having 21        the largest population, and one trustee shall be 22        appointed from each of the other such municipalities, 23        and 2 trustees shall be appointed at large.24            (c) Trustees representing the area within the 25        district located outside of any municipality having 26        5,000 or more population and trustees appointed at   SB1233- 4 -LRB104 05147 RTM 15176 b1        large when the district is wholly contained within a 2        single county shall be appointed by the presiding 3        officer of the county board with the advice and 4        consent of the county board and any trustee 5        representing the area within any such municipality 6        shall be appointed by its presiding officer. If 7        however the district is located in more than one 8        county, any trustee representing the area within a 9        district located outside of any municipality having 10        5,000 or more population and any trustee at large 11        shall be appointed by a majority vote of the presiding 12        officers of the county boards of the counties which 13        encompass any part of the district, except that no 14        such appointment shall affect the term of any trustee 15        in office on the effective date of this amendatory Act 16        of 1977. Any trustee representing the area within any 17        such municipality shall be appointed by its presiding 18        officer.19            (d) A trustee representing the area within any 20        such municipality shall reside within its corporate 21        limits. A trustee representing the area within the 22        district and located outside of any such municipality 23        shall reside within such area. A trustee appointed at 24        large may reside either within or without any such 25        municipality but must reside within the territory of 26        the district. Should any trustee cease to reside   SB1233- 5 -LRB104 05147 RTM 15176 b1        within that part of the territory he represents, then 2        his office shall be deemed vacated, and shall be 3        filled by appointment for the remainder of the term as 4        hereinafter provided.5        (2) In case there are no municipalities having a 6    population of 5,000 or more within such district located 7    wholly within a single county, the statement required by 8    Section 1 shall include such finding, and in such case the 9    Board shall consist of 5 trustees who shall be appointed 10    at large by the presiding officer of the county board with 11    the advice and consent of the county board. If however the 12    district is located in more than one county, the trustees 13    at large shall be appointed by a majority vote of the 14    presiding officers of the county boards of the counties 15    which encompass any portion of the district, but any 16    trustee in office on the effective date of this amendatory 17    Act of 1977 shall be permitted to serve out the remainder 18    of his term. Each such trustee shall reside within the 19    district and shall continue to reside therein.20        (3) All initial appointments of trustees shall be made 21    within 60 days after the determination of the result of 22    the election. Each appointment shall be in writing and 23    shall be filed and made a matter of record in the office of 24    the county clerk wherein the organization proceedings were 25    filed. A trustee shall qualify within 10 days after 26    appointment by acceptance and the taking of the   SB1233- 6 -LRB104 05147 RTM 15176 b1    constitutional oath of office, both to be in writing and 2    similarly filed for record in the office of such county 3    clerk. Members initially appointed to the board of 4    trustees of such district shall serve from date of 5    appointment for 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 years and shall draw lots 6    to determine the periods for which they each shall serve. 7    In case there are more than 5 trustees, lots shall be drawn 8    so that 5 trustees shall serve initial terms of 1, 2, 3, 4 9    and 5 years and the other trustees shall serve terms of 1, 10    2, 3, 4 or 5 years as the number of trustees shall require 11    and the drawing of lots shall determine. The successors of 12    all such initial members of the board of trustees of a 13    river conservancy district shall serve for terms of 5 14    years, all such appointments and appointments to fill 15    vacancies shall be made in like manner as in the case of 16    the initial trustees. A trustee having been duly appointed 17    shall continue to serve after the expiration of his term 18    until his successor has been appointed. Each trustee 19    initially appointed in accordance with this amendatory Act 20    of 1995 shall serve a term of 3 or 5 years as determined by 21    lot.22        (4) Should a municipality which is wholly within a 23    district attain, or should such a municipality be 24    established, having a population of 5,000 or more after 25    the entry of the statement by the circuit court, the 26    presiding officer of such municipality may petition the   SB1233- 7 -LRB104 05147 RTM 15176 b1    circuit court of the county in which such municipality 2    lies for an order finding and determining the population 3    of such municipality and, if it is found and determined 4    upon the hearing of such petition that the population of 5    such municipality is 5,000 or more, the board of trustees 6    of such district as previously established shall be 7    increased by one trustee who shall reside within the 8    corporate limits of such municipality and shall be 9    appointed by its presiding officer. The initial trustee so 10    appointed shall serve for a term of 1, 2, 3, 4 or 5 years, 11    as may be determined by lot, and his successors shall be 12    similarly appointed and shall serve for terms of 5 years. 13    All provisions of this Section applicable to trustees 14    representing municipal areas shall apply to any such 15    trustee, including paragraph 5.16        (5) Should the foregoing provisions respecting the 17    appointment of trustees representing the area within any 18    municipality of 5,000 or more population be invalid when 19    applied to any situation, then as to such situation any 20    such provision shall be deemed to be excised from this 21    Act, and the trustee whose appointment is thus affected 22    shall be appointed at large by the presiding officer of 23    the county board with the advice and consent of the county 24    board except if the district embraces more than one county 25    in which case the trustees shall be appointed at large by a 26    majority vote of the presiding officers of the county   SB1233- 8 -LRB104 05147 RTM 15176 b1    boards of the counties which encompass any portion of the 2    district.3        (6) In the case of boards a board representing 4    districts a district that embrace Jackson County or 5    embraces Franklin and Jefferson counties, a trustee may be 6    removed for incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance 7    in office by the appropriate appointing presiding officer 8    or officers, without the advice and consent of the 9    corporate authorities, by filing a written order of 10    removal with the appropriate county or municipal clerk or 11    clerks. 12        (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 13    contrary, in the case of a board representing a district 14    that embraces Franklin and Jefferson counties, the terms 15    of all trustees shall end on the effective date of this 16    amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly. Beginning on 17    that date, the board shall consist of 7 trustees. The 7 18    trustees initially appointed pursuant to this amendatory 19    Act of the 94th General Assembly shall be appointed in the 20    same manner as otherwise provided in this Section by the 21    appropriate appointing authority and shall serve the 22    following terms, as determined by lot: (i) 2 trustees 23    shall serve until July 1, 2006; (ii) 2 trustees shall 24    serve until July 1, 2007; (iii) one trustee shall serve 25    until July 1, 2008; (iv) one trustee shall serve until 26    July 1, 2009; and (v) one trustee shall serve until July 1,   SB1233- 9 -LRB104 05147 RTM 15176 b1    2010. Upon expiration of the terms of the trustees 2    initially appointed under this amendatory Act of the 94th 3    General Assembly, their respective successors shall be 4    appointed for terms of 5 years, beginning on July 1 of the 5    year in which the previous term expires and until their 6    respective successors are appointed and qualified. After 7    the appointment of the trustees initially appointed 8    pursuant to this amendatory Act of the 94th General 9    Assembly, the number of trustees on the board may be 10    increased in accordance with subsection (4).11(Source: P.A. 103-79, eff. 6-9-23.)